src/morphology/hacks/tagger-hacks.lexc
[WORD_ID=tiukentavat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0tiukentavat	#	;
[WORD_ID=tiukentuvista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0tiukentuvista	#	;
[WORD_ID=tiukimmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=SUP]:0tiukimmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=tiukkenevien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0tiukkenevien	#	;
[WORD_ID=todellakaan][POS=ADVERB][CLIT=KAAN]:0todellakaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=todellakin][POS=ADVERB][CLIT=KIN]:0todellakin	#	;
[WORD_ID=todenmukaisemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0todenmukaisemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0todennettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0todennettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennettaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0todennettaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0todennettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennettavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0todennettavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennäköisemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0todennäköisemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennäköisimmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=SUP]:0todennäköisimmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennäköisyysnäytön][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0todennäköisyysnäytön	#	;
[WORD_ID=todennäköisyyspohjaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0todennäköisyyspohjaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0todentavaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavaa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0todentavaa	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavaksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:0todentavaksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavalla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0todentavalla	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavana][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:0todentavana	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0todentavan	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentava][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0todentava	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0todentavat	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0todentavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0todentavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0todentavilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=todentavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0todentavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=todettava][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0todettava	#	;
[WORD_ID=todettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0todettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=todettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0todettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=todettaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0todettaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=todettavissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0todettavissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=todettavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0todettavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=todistushakemuskohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0todistushakemuskohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=todistushakemuskohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0todistushakemuskohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=todistuskohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0todistuskohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpanevaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0toimeenpanevaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpaneva][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimeenpaneva	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpanevia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0toimeenpanevia	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpanevien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimeenpanevien	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpaneviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0toimeenpaneviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpaneviksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:0toimeenpaneviksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpanevina][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:0toimeenpanevina	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpanevista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0toimeenpanevista	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpantavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0toimeenpantavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpantavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimeenpantavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimeenpantavilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0toimeenpantavilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimenpidekohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimenpidekohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimenpidekohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimenpidekohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimenpidekohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimenpidekohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimenpisteistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0toimenpisteistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimialakohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaiseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0toimialakohtaiseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaiseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:0toimialakohtaiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0toimialakohtaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaiselle][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:0toimialakohtaiselle	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisena][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:0toimialakohtaisena	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0toimialakohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisessa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:0toimialakohtaisessa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimialakohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0toimialakohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0toimialakohtaisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisiksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:0toimialakohtaisiksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0toimialakohtaisilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0toimialakohtaisille	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:0toimialakohtaisin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0toimialakohtaisissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0toimialakohtaisista	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0toimialakohtaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialakohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimialakohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimialuekohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0toimialuekohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimielinkohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimielinkohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimielinkohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimielinkohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimielintenvälinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimielintenvälinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimielintenväliseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0toimielintenväliseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimielintenvälisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0toimielintenvälisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimielintenvälisessä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:0toimielintenvälisessä	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimielintenväliset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimielintenväliset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimijakohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimijakohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimijakohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0toimijakohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimijakohtaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0toimijakohtaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimijakohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimijakohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimikohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimikohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimikohtaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0toimikohtaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimikohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0toimikohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimikohtaisesta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:0toimikohtaisesta	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimikohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimikohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimikohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimikohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimilupapohjaisissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0toimilupapohjaisissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintakohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimintakohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintakohtaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0toimintakohtaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintakohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0toimintakohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintakohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimintakohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintaluokkakohtaisista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0toimintaluokkakohtaisista	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintarajoitteiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimintarajoitteiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintarajoitteisille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0toimintarajoitteisille	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintarajoitteisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimintarajoitteisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintokohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimintokohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintokohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0toimintokohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintokohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimintokohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintokohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0toimintokohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintokohtaisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0toimintokohtaisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintokohtaisissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0toimintokohtaisissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintokohtaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0toimintokohtaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintokohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimintokohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintoperusteinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimintoperusteinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintoperusteiseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0toimintoperusteiseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintoperusteiseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:0toimintoperusteiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintoperusteisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0toimintoperusteisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintoperusteisessa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:0toimintoperusteisessa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimintoperusteista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0toimintoperusteista	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimipisteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0toimipisteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimipisteistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0toimipisteistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimittavaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0toimittavaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimittava][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toimittava	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimittavat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toimittavat	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimittavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0toimittavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimittavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toimittavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimittaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0toimittaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimittavissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0toimittavissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toimittavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0toimittavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=toinenkin][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][CLIT=KIN]:0toinenkin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toinen][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0toinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toiseen][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0toiseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toiseksi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:0toiseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisellakaan][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE][CLIT=KAAN]:0toisellakaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisella][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0toisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisellekin][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL][CLIT=KIN]:0toisellekin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toiselle][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:0toiselle	#	;
[WORD_ID=toiselta][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:0toiselta	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisena][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:0toisena	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisenasteisena][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:0toisenasteisena	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisenkaan][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN][CLIT=KAAN]:0toisenkaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisenkin][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN][CLIT=KIN]:0toisenkin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisen][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0toisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisensa][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][POSS=3]:0toisensa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisessakin][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE][CLIT=KIN]:0toisessakin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisessa][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:0toisessa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisesta][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:0toisesta	#	;
[WORD_ID=toiset][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0toiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisiaan][POS=PRONOUN][CASE=PAR][POSS=3]:0toisiaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisiansa][POS=PRONOUN][CASE=PAR][POSS=3]:0toisiansa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisia][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0toisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisien][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0toisien	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisiin][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0toisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisiinsa][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL][POSS=3]:0toisiinsa	#	;
[WORD_ID=toisiksi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:0toisiksi	#	;
